src/fst/phonology.twolc
 Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j) Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:] ;
! Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:) l: (ˈ:) _ (j)   PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:] ;
!! pääʹljes+N+Sg+Nom: **path/polku**
!!€ pä^1VOW0lljes^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^CC2C
!!€ pääʹl0jes000000
!! talsted+V+Inf:
!!€ taallâst^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed
!!€ ta0l00st00000>ed

   u: (ʹ:|%{ʹØ%}:) v:u (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) l: _  %^V2VV: ((%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL:|%^PALNo:) [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:|%^CCC2C:|%^XYY2XY:|%^XYY2VY:] ;
!!  vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ vu^1VOWv0ll^PAL^XYY2VY
!!€ vu0uʹl000
      [v:| j:] (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) l _  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^XYY2VY:] ;

!! deriving kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹl
!!€ kuâ0ll^V2VV^PALE^PAL^CC2C
!!€ kueʹl00000

"j:0 "
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 j:0 <=>
     j: (ˈ:) _ [ NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^J2I:) | Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ] [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:| %^CCC2C:|%^XYY2XY:|%^XYY2VY:] ;

!! ǩeʹrjj+N+Pl+Nom: **book/kirja**
!!€ ǩẹ^1VOW0rjj^V2VV^PAL^XYY2XY
!!€ ǩeeʹrj0000
!! tuâjj+N+Sg+Acc: **work/työ**
!!€ tuâjj^CC2C
!!€ tuâj00
!! tuâjj+N+Sg+Gen:tuâi
!!€ tuâjj^J2I^CC2C
!!€ tuâi000
!    j: _ Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:] ;
!!€ po^1VOWjjâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C
!!€ pooj0âs0000
      v: (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) j _  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^XYY2VY:] ;


"Even syllabic verbs I, cg for g"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
 g:0 <=>  Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) (Cns:+) g: (ˈ:) _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
  Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ŋ g  _ Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!! cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ cõõggâlm^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>a
!!€ cõ0g00lm00000>a
!!€ ǩeâlggal^Pen^XYY2XY
!!€ ǩeâlǥ0al00

          Vow: (%^1VOW:)  [i (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)|u (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) |(0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  (ŋ|r|l|d:)] g: (ˈ:) _    NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:|%^CCC2CAllegro:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
!! äiʹǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen: **time/aika**
!!€ ä^1VOWi0gg^V2VV^PAL^XYY2XY
!!€ ääiʹj0000
!! reäiʹǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom: **hole/reikä**
!!€ reäi0gg^PAL^XYY2XY
!!€ reäiʹj000


"Allegro loss ǧ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
ǧ:0 <=> Vow: (%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:|ʹ) ǧ _ Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;
!!€ lååʹǧǧest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow
!!€ lå0ʹǧ00st00000

!! GEMINATE TO WEAK QUALITY GEMINATE
"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and KK>ǤǤ"
!! **@RULENAME@**  - used in
!! used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen for cases like
!! lookki > looǥǥi.
 k:ǥ <=>
    Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  k: _ NeutrVowLenghtHeight %^KK2GG: ;
    Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  _ [k: | %{XC%}:]  NeutrVowLenghtHeight [%^KK2GG: | %^K2GG:] ;
    
    Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  k: _ Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLenghtHeight %^Pen: %^KK2GG: ;
    Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  _ k: Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLenghtHeight %^Pen: [%^KK2GG: | %^K2GG:] ;

!! čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ čâustõ^1VOW{ʹØ}k{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ čâustõõ0ǥǥ00
       Vow: (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  _ BetweenStemAndPALNo %^K2GAllegro: ;
!! with allegro
!! čâustõk+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3
!!€ čâustõ{ʹØ}k^K2GAllegro>stes
!!€ čâustõ0ǥ0>stes

    k: (ˈ:) _ NeutrVowLenghtHeight [%^KK2GG: | %^KKK2GG:] ;
    Vow:Vow (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0) _ (ˈ:) k: NeutrVowLenghtHeight [%^KK2GG: | %^KKK2GG:] ;
!!€ jo^1VOWkk^V2VV^KK2GG
!!€ jooǥǥ00
!! puâǥǥ+N+Sg+Nom: ****
!!€ puõkˈk^VOWLower^KKK2GG
!!€ puâǥ0ǥ00

!! čuâǥǥas+N+Sg+Nom  **road**
!!€ čuâkˈk^KKK2GG>as
!!€ čuâǥ0ǥ0>as

  Vow:Vow (%^1VOW:|Vow:0) (%{ʹØ%}:0) _ k: BetweenStemAndPALNo %^KK2GAllegro: ;
!! loǥškueʹtted **begin to read**
!!€ loo{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škueʹtted
!!€ lo00ǥ000»škueʹtted

  Vow:Vow (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0) k: (ˈ:) _ Vow: Cns:* PenBetweenStemAndPALNo %^Pen: [%^KKK2GG: | %^KK2GG: ] ;
  Vow:Vow (%^1VOW:) (%{ʹØ%}:0)  _ (ˈ:) k: Vow: Cns:* PenBetweenStemAndPALNo %^Pen: [%^KKK2GG: | %^KK2GG: ] ;
!! čõõǥǥâs
!!€ čõ^1VOWkkâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^KK2GG
!!€ čõõǥǥâs0000



"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and k:j"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
!! used with
!!  > .
 k:j <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW:) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  k: _  (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^PALÕ:|%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL: %^KK2GG: ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (:ˈ) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]     _ [ k: (i:) |%{XC%}:] NeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^PALÕ:|%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) [%^PAL: %^KK2GG:| %^Allegro: %^PAL: %^KK2GAllegro:| %^PAL: %^K2GG: ] ;
!         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (:ˈ) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]     _ [ k: (i:) |0:|%{XC%}:] NeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) [%^PAL: %^KK2GG:| %^Allegro: %^PAL: %^KK2GAllegro:| %^PAL: %^K2GG: ] ;
!! tuʹmstõk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: **decision/päätös, mietintö**
!!€ tuʹmstõ^1VOW0k{XC}^V2VV^PAL^K2GG>e
!!€ tuʹmstõõʹjj000>e

     Vow: (%^1VOW:) (:ˈ) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]   _  BetweenStemAndPALNo  %^PAL: %^K2GAllegro: ;
!! with allegro

!!2015-10-05
  Vow: (%^1VOW:) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  k: (ˈ:)  _ (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL: [ %^KK2GG:| %^KKK2GG:] ;
  Vow: (%^1VOW:) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]   _ (ˈ:) k: (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) %^PAL: [%^KK2GG: | %^KKK2GG:] ;
!!€ suä0kk^PALẸ^PAL^KK2GG
!!€ suẹʹjj000

  Vow (%^1VOW:) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  k:  (ˈ:)   _ Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:) %^Pen: %^PAL: %^Pen: %^KKK2GG: ;
   Vow: (%^1VOW:) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]   _  (ˈ:)  k: Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeight (%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:) %^Pen: %^PAL: %^Pen: %^KKK2GG: ;
!!€ jeä0kˈkel^Pen^PALE^Pen^PAL^Pen^KKK2GG^RmVow>až
!!€ jeeʹj0j0l0000000>až


"Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and ǩ:j"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in
!! used with
!!  > .
 ǩ:j <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ǩ: _  (i:)  NeutrVowLenghtHeight ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG: ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ ǩ: (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG: ;

  Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ǩ:   _ (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG: ;
  Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  _  ǩ: (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeight ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG: ;

  Vow: (%^1VOW:)   (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ǩ: (ˈ:) _ (i:) PALAllo ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:)  %^KKK2GG: ;
  Vow: (%^1VOW:)   (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)          _ (ˈ:) ǩ: (i:) PALAllo ((%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KKK2GG: ;


"š:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in Allegro
 š:0 <=>
      Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: š _  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:|%^XYY2XY:] ;
         (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: š _ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s m|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL  [%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:]|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;

      Vow: (%^1VOW:|%{ˈ1%}:|0:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: š _ Vow: Cns:+  PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2C:|(%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:] ;

!! šapšš+N+Sg+Gen **white fish/siika**
!!€ ša^1VOWpšš^V2VV^XYY2XY
!!€ šaapš000
       Vow: (%^1VOW:| %{ˈ1%}:|0:) [ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  (Cns:) |(ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) | [u|i] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ] š: (ˈ:) _ NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) [%^CC2C:| %^CC2CAllegro:| %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^XYY2XY:|%^XYY2VY:] ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW:| %{ˈ1%}:|0:) [ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  (Cns:) |(ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [h:|j:] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) | [u|i] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ] š: (ˈ:) _ Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PAL:) [%^Pen: %^CC2C:| %^Pen: %^CC2CAllegro:| %^Pen: %^CCC2CAllegro:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:] ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW:| %{ˈ1%}:|0:)  (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  š:  _ NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^KK2GAllegro: ;
!! ruõšsted+V+Inf: ****
!!€ ruõ{ˈ1%}ššâst^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow>ed
!!€ ruõˈš00st000>ed


"Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing š:ž"
!! **@RULENAME@** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
 š:ž <=>
 Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) š: _   (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^KK2GG: ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ [š: (i:) |%{XC%}:] [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:) NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL|PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL] (%^I2J:) [ %^KK2GG: | %^K2GG: ] ;
!! lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen
!!€ lookkmõ^1VOWš{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ lookkmõõžž00
       Vow: (%^1VOW:) 0:*  _  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^K2GAllegro: ;
!! with allegro


          Vow: (%^1VOW:)      (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) š:  ˈ:  _ (i:)  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^KKK2GG: ;
          Vow: (%^1VOW:)      (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) _   ˈ:  š: (i:)  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^KKK2GG: ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  _ š: (%^VV2V: ) %^KK2GAllegro: ;
!!€ pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt
!!€ på0z000»škuätt

      Vow: (%^1VOW:)   _ PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing %^VC: ;
!! mainstummuš+N+Sg+Gen:
!!€ mainstummuš^VC
!!€ mainstummuž0

         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) š: (ˈ:) _  Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^Pen: [ %^KKK2GG: | %^KK2GG: ] ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ (ˈ:) š: Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^Pen: [%^KKK2GG:| %^KK2GG: |%^KKK2G:] ;



"Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing c:ʒ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - cc:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
 c:ʒ <=> Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) c: _   (i:)  NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^KK2GG: ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ c: (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) [%^KK2GG:|%^KK2GAllegro:] ;
!!€ čää0cc^PAL^KK2GG
!!€ čääʹʒʒ00
!! čääʹcc+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
!!€ čää0cc^VV2V^PAL^KK2GAllegro>stes
!!€ čä0ʹʒ0000>stes
!!€ čää0cc^PAL^KK2GG>stes
!!€ čääʹʒʒ00>stes
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) c: ˈ: _    (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^KKK2GG: ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ ˈ: c: (i:) NeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) [%^KKK2GG:|%^KKK2G:] ;
!!€ puõcˈc^VOWLower^PALÄ^KKK2GG
!!€ puäʒ0ʒ000
                                   _ %^VC: ;
       Vow: (%^1VOW:)  _ c: (%^VV2V: ) %^KK2GAllegro: ;
!!€ pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt
!!€ på0z000»škuätt

         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) c: (ˈ:) _  Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^Pen: [ %^KKK2GG: | %^KK2GG: ] ;
         Vow: (%^1VOW:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)    _ (ˈ:) c: Vow: Cns:* PenNeutrVowLenghtHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL (%^I2J:) %^Pen: [%^KKK2GG:| %^KK2GG: |%^KKK2G:] ;
!! õõʒʒâs+N+Sg+Nom: **high water/vuoksi**
!!€ õ^1VOWccâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^KK2GG
!!€ õõʒʒâs0000
